src/morphology/affixes/nouns.lexc
!! Noun inflection
!! ---------------
!! The Somali nouns inflect in cases, are marked for gender and number.

! Can specify test words that should be generated with the paradigm here, but currently it will only generate the words, not compare to what should be the outcome.

! TODO: Vocative

! TODO: need to go crazy on tone generation

! TODO: genitive plural

! TODO: document noun inflectional classes and tones; collect paradigms.
!       some groups appear to be off:
!
!           *gúriyaha -> guriyáha

! TODO: how to deal with gender marking in plural? generation may be tricky, may 
!       need to tag differently.

LEXICON NullCase/Clitics
+Abs:0                      Clitics ;   
+Nom:0                      Clitics ;      
+Gen:0                      Clitics ;

LEXICON NullCase
+Abs:0                      Clitics ;   
+Nom:0                      Clitics ;      
+Gen:0                      Clitics ;

LEXICON NullCase/inom
+Abs:0                      Clitics ;   
+Nom+Sty/i:i                        Clitics ;      
+Nom:0                      Clitics ;      
+Gen:0                      Clitics ;


!D1_F
LEXICON NOUN1_F

    @P.Gender.Fem@      _N1FPBSg ; 
    @P.Gender.Masc@     _N1MPBPl ; 

    NIMO ;

    LEXICON _N1FPBSg
        +N+Decl/1+Fem+Sg:´%>{N}       NOUN1_F_PostBoundarySg ; 
        ! No tone on stem in genitive
        +N+Decl/1+Fem+Sg+Gen:%>{N}eed´                    Clitics ;

    LEXICON _N1MPBPl
        +N+Decl/1+Masc+Pl:´%>{N}      NOUN1_F_PostBoundaryPl ; 
        ! No tone on stem in genitive
        +N+Decl/1+Masc+Pl+Gen:%>{N}ood´                    Clitics ;

    ! TODO: flag diacritic for gender, why isn't it working
    LEXICON NOUN1_F/SgOnly
        @P.Gender.Fem@      _N1FSgFlag ;

        LEXICON _N1FSgFlag
            +N+Decl/1+Fem+Sg:´%>{N}       NOUN1_F_PostBoundarySg ;


    LEXICON NOUN1_F_PostBoundarySg
    +Indef:0                    NullCase/inom ;

    +Indef+Voc:ay               Clitics ;

    +Def:t                      SgProximity ;
    +Def+Voc:tay                Clitics ;

    LEXICON NOUN1_F_PostBoundaryPl
    +Indef:o%>                 NullCase/Clitics ;
                                MascPl ; 


!D1_M



LEXICON NOUN1_M/SgOnly

    @P.Gender.Masc@     _N_1_M_Sg_PB ;

    NIMO ;


LEXICON NOUN1_M/PlOnly

    @P.Gender.Masc@     _N_1_M_Pl_PB ;

    NIMO ;


    LEXICON NOUN1_M
        @P.Gender.Masc@     _N_1_M_Sg_PB ;
        @P.Gender.Masc@     _N_1_M_Pl_PB ;


    LEXICON NOUN1_MF

        @P.Gender.Masc@     _N_1_M_Sg_PB ;
        @P.Gender.Fem@      _N_1_MF_Pl_PB ;

    ! TODO: check tones
    LEXICON _N_1_M_Sg_PB
        +N+Decl/1+Masc+Sg:´´%>{N}      NOUN1_M_PostBoundarySg ;

    LEXICON _N_1_M_Pl_PB
        +N+Decl/1+Masc+Pl:´´%>{N}      NOUN1_M_PostBoundaryPl ;

    LEXICON _N_1_MF_Pl_PB
        +N+Decl/1+Fem+Pl:´´%>{N}       NOUN1_MF_PostBoundaryPl ;

        LEXICON NOUN1_M_PostBoundarySg
        +Indef:0                     NullCase ;
        +Indef+Voc:ow                Clitics ;

        +Def:k                       SgProximity ;
        +Def+Voc:kow                 Clitics ;

        LEXICON NOUN1_M_PostBoundaryPl
        +Indef:o%>                  NullCase/Clitics ;
                                     MascPl ;

        ! TODO: Possessives?  funny.
        LEXICON NOUN1_MF_PostBoundaryPl
        +Indef:yo%>                 NullCase/Clitics ;
            :y                       FemPl ;



! D2_M
LEXICON NOUN2_M

    @P.Gender.Masc@     _N_2_MF_Sg_PB ;
    @P.Gender.Fem@      _N_2_MF_Pl_PB ;  

    NIMO ;

! TODO: check -- maybe this is post root tone now? albaabáda or albaábada?

    LEXICON _N_2_MF_Sg_PB
        +N+Decl/2+Masc+Sg:´´%>{N}          NOUN2_M_PostBoundarySg ;

    LEXICON _N_2_MF_Pl_PB
        +N+Decl/2+Fem+Pl:´%>{N}            NOUN2_M_PostBoundaryPl ;  

! TODO: plural possible?
LEXICON NOUN2_M_Coll

    @P.Gender.Masc@     _N_2_M_Coll_Sg_PB ;

    NIMO ;

    LEXICON _N_2_M_Coll_Sg_PB
        +N+Decl/2+Coll+Masc+Sg:´´%>{N}          NOUN2_M_PostBoundarySg ;

! TODO: plural possible?
LEXICON NOUN2_F_Coll

    @P.Gender.Fem@     _N_2_F_Coll_Sg_PB ;

    NIMO ;

    LEXICON _N_2_F_Coll_Sg_PB
        +N+Decl/2+Coll+Fem+Sg:´´%>{N}       NOUN2_F_PostBoundarySg ;

LEXICON WARAYSI
    aysi:aysi NOUN2_M_yo ;
    aysi+Use/NG:eysi NOUN2_M_yo ;
    aysi+Use/NG:eeysi NOUN2_M_yo ;

    ayso:aysa V3A_VerbMorf ;
    ayso+Use/NG:eysa V3A_VerbMorf ;
    ayso+Use/NG:eeysa V3A_VerbMorf ;

LEXICON AFAREYSI
    eysi:eysi NOUN2_M_yo ;
    eysi+Use/NG:aysi NOUN2_M_yo ;
    eysi+Use/NG:eeysi NOUN2_M_yo ;

    eyso:eysa V3A_VerbMorf ;
    eyso+Use/NG:aysa V3A_VerbMorf ;
    eyso+Use/NG:eeysa V3A_VerbMorf ;

LEXICON NOUN2_M_yo

    @P.Gender.Masc@     _N_2_yo_MF_Sg_PB ;
    @P.Gender.Fem@      _N_2_yo_MF_Pl_PB ;  

    NIMO ;

    ! TODO: check -- maybe this is post root tone now? albaabáda or albaábada?

    LEXICON _N_2_yo_MF_Sg_PB
        +N+Decl/2+Masc+Sg:´´%>{N}          NOUN2_M_PostBoundarySg ;

    LEXICON _N_2_yo_MF_Pl_PB
        +N+Decl/2+Fem+Pl:´%>{N}            NOUN2_M_PostBoundaryPl_yo ;  


LEXICON NOUN2_M_o

    @P.Gender.Masc@     _N_2_o_MF_Sg_PB ;
    @P.Gender.Fem@      _N_2_o_MF_Pl_PB ;  

    NIMO ;

    LEXICON _N_2_o_MF_Sg_PB
        +N+Decl/2+Masc+Sg:´´%>{N}          NOUN2_M_PostBoundarySg ;

    LEXICON _N_2_o_MF_Pl_PB
        +N+Decl/2+Fem+Pl:´%>{N}            NOUN2_M_PostBoundaryPl_o ;  

    LEXICON NOUN2_M_PostBoundarySg
    +Indef:0                     NullCase ;
    +Indef+Voc:ow                Clitics ;

    +Def:k                       SgProximity ;
    +Def+Voc:kow                 Clitics ;

    LEXICON NOUN2_M_PostBoundaryPl
    +Indef:{C2}o%>            NullCase/Clitics ; 
    :{C2}                  FemPl ;
    +Indef+Gen:{C2}oo´d                 Clitics ; 

    LEXICON NOUN2_M_PostBoundaryPl_yo
    +Indef:yo%>             NullCase/Clitics ; 
    :y                       FemPl ;
    +Indef+Gen:yoo´d          Clitics ; 

    LEXICON NOUN2_M_PostBoundaryPl_o
    +Indef:o%>             NullCase/Clitics ; 
    :                       FemPl ;
    +Indef+Gen:oo´d          Clitics ; 

LEXICON NOUN2_F

    @P.Gender.Fem@  _N_2_F_Sg_PB ;
    @P.Gender.Fem@  _N_2_F_Pl_PB ;

    NIMO ;

    LEXICON _N_2_F_Sg_PB
        +N+Decl/2+Fem+Sg:´´%>{N}       NOUN2_F_PostBoundarySg ;

    LEXICON _N_2_F_Pl_PB
        ! TODO: check tones
        +N+Decl/2+Fem+Pl:´%>{N}        NOUN2_F_PostBoundaryPl ;  

    LEXICON NOUN2_F_PostBoundarySg
    +Indef:0                     NullCase ;
    +Indef+Voc:ay                Clitics ;
    +Indef+Gen:aa´d               Clitics ; 

    +Def:t                       SgProximity ;
    +Def+Voc:tay                 Clitics ;

    LEXICON NOUN2_F_PostBoundaryPl
    +Indef:yo%>                NullCase/Clitics ; 
    :y                       FemPl ;


! TODO: galáb galbáha, or gálbaha?
LEXICON NOUN3_F 

    @P.Gender.Fem@          _N_3_F_Sg_PB ;
    @P.Gender.Masc@         _N_3_F_Pl_PB ;

    NIMO ;

    LEXICON _N_3_F_Sg_PB
        +N+Decl/3+Fem+Sg:´%>{N}        NOUN3_F_PostBoundarySg ;

    LEXICON _N_3_F_Pl_PB
        +N+Decl/3+Masc+Pl:´%>{N}       NOUN3_F_PostBoundaryPl ;


    LEXICON NOUN3_F_PostBoundarySg
    +Indef:0                     NullCase ;
    +Indef+Voc:ay                Clitics ;

    +Def:t                       SgProximity ;
    +Def+Voc:tay                 Clitics ;


    LEXICON NOUN3_F_PostBoundaryPl
    +Pl+Indef:o%>               NullCase/Clitics ; 

                                 MascPl ; ! (a?)
    +Indef+Gen:oo´d               Clitics ; 
    +Def+Gen:ahood               Clitics ; 
    ! TODO: Need to check these with a corpus (why did I write this?)



! D3_M
! TODO: tone in plurals?
LEXICON NOUN3_M
    @P.Gender.Masc@             _N_3_M_Sg_PB ;
    @P.Gender.Masc@             _N_3_M_Pl_PB ;

    NIMO ;

    LEXICON _N_3_M_Sg_PB
        +N+Decl/3+Masc+Sg:´´%>{N}          NOUN3_M_PostBoundarySg ;

    LEXICON _N_3_M_Pl_PB
        +N+Decl/3+Masc+Pl:´%>{N}           NOUN3_M_PostBoundaryPl ;
