src/morphology/stems/nouns.lexc
LEXICON D1_F
  bad	NOUN1_F ;
  curad	NOUN1_F ;
  dabayl	NOUN1_F ;
  dayuurad	NOUN1_F ;
  dhallinyaronimad	NOUN1_F ;
  hal	NOUN1_F ;
  hees	NOUN1_F ;
  jidh	NOUN1_F ;
  kataarad	NOUN1_F ;
  laambad	NOUN1_F ;
  macallimad	NOUN1_F ;
  meel	NOUN1_F ;
  musharraxiin:musharraxii{m}	NOUN1_F ;
  qasacad	NOUN1_F ;
  saaxiibad	NOUN1_F ;
  shandad	NOUN1_F ;
  warqad	NOUN1_F ;
LEXICON D1_M/SgOnly
  afuuf	NOUN1_M/SgOnly ;
  ballaadh	NOUN1_M/SgOnly ;
  bannaan	NOUN1_M/SgOnly ;
  carshi	NOUN1_M/SgOnly ;
  cayn	NOUN1_M/SgOnly ;
  dad	NOUN1_M/SgOnly ;
  dharab	NOUN1_M/SgOnly ;
  doog:¨doog	NOUN1_M/SgOnly ;
  gudcur	NOUN1_M/SgOnly ;
  kafaaraggud	NOUN1_M/SgOnly ;
  kulan	NOUN1_M/SgOnly ;
  markab	NOUN1_M/SgOnly ;
  qabiil	NOUN1_M/SgOnly ;
  quduus	NOUN1_M/SgOnly ;
  sheqel	NOUN1_M/SgOnly ;
  waqti	NOUN1_M/SgOnly ;
  woqooyi	NOUN1_M/SgOnly ;
LEXICON D1_M
  afarrey	NOUN1_M ;
  agagaar	NOUN1_M ;
  anshax	NOUN1_M ;
  buur	NOUN1_M ;
  cufnaan-hoorbeeg	NOUN1_M ;
  daah	NOUN1_MF ;
  dhallinyar	NOUN1_MF ;
  dibi	NOUN1_MF ;
  duriyad	NOUN1_M ;
  gaadhifardood	NOUN1_MF ;
  gees	NOUN1_M ;
  guri	NOUN1_MF ;
  guri+Use/NG:gur	NOUN1_MF ;
  guri+Use/NG:gury	NOUN1_M ;
  heeraab	NOUN1_M ;
  injiil	NOUN1_M ;
  jeexjeex	NOUN1_MF ;
  jidh	NOUN1_M ;
  limf	NOUN1_M ;
  mu'aammarad	NOUN1_M ;
  nayl	NOUN1_M ;
  nibiri	NOUN1_MF ;
  onkod	NOUN1_MF ;
  sac	NOUN1_M ;
  sanam:sana{mm}	NOUN1_MF ;
  waxar	NOUN1_M ;
  xadgudub	NOUN1_MF ;
  xidig	NOUN1_M ;
LEXICON D1_F/SgOnly
  baroor	NOUN1_F/SgOnly ;
  caarranaan	NOUN1_F/SgOnly ;
  ciid	NOUN1_F/SgOnly ;
  dheregsanaan	NOUN1_F/SgOnly ;
  diidniin:diidnii{m}	NOUN1_F/SgOnly ;
  feeyignaan	NOUN1_F/SgOnly ;
  gurranaan	NOUN1_F/SgOnly ;
  in	NOUN1_F/SgOnly ;
  jariidad	NOUN1_F/SgOnly ;
  ladnaan	NOUN1_F/SgOnly ;
  maldahnaan	NOUN1_F/SgOnly ;
  nadoocsanaan	NOUN1_F/SgOnly ;
  qaabsanaan	NOUN1_F/SgOnly ;
  qorrax	NOUN1_F/SgOnly ;
  sarwacnaan	NOUN1_F/SgOnly ;
  udgoonaan	NOUN1_F/SgOnly ;
  xuquuq	NOUN1_F/SgOnly ;
LEXICON Collective
  ahmin	NOUN2_M_Coll ;
  alifley	NOUN2_F_Coll ;
  barandi	NOUN2_M_Coll ;
  barijugley	NOUN2_F_Coll ;
  bisqan	NOUN2_F_Coll ;
  caanaggaleen	NOUN2_M_Coll ;
  canaasiir	NOUN2_F_Coll ;
  cidlajoog	NOUN2_F_Coll ;
  ciyaal	NOUN2_M_Coll ;
  daraawiish	NOUN2_F_Coll ;
  dhiigmiirato:dhiigmiirata	NOUN2_F_Coll ;
  dhulkasoofuur	NOUN2_M_Coll ;
  dumar	NOUN2_M_Coll ;
  fardooley	NOUN2_F_Coll ;
  gammaan	NOUN2_M_Coll ;
  geednugeyl	NOUN2_M_Coll ;
  geri	NOUN2_M_Coll ;
  geylaan	NOUN2_F_Coll ;
  habarwadaag	NOUN2_M_Coll ;
  hoomo:hooma	NOUN2_F_Coll ;
  ibalaroor	NOUN2_M_Coll ;
  jeermi	NOUN2_M_Coll ;
  khudrad	NOUN2_F_Coll ;
  lul	NOUN2_F_Coll ;
  oofato:oofata	NOUN2_F_Coll ;
  qaan	NOUN2_M_Coll ;
  raacdo:raacda	NOUN2_F_Coll ;
  raashin	NOUN2_M_Coll ;
  sarsaar	NOUN2_M_Coll ;
  sooryo:soorya	NOUN2_F_Coll ;
  wiciyad	NOUN2_F_Coll ;
  xanan	NOUN2_M_Coll ;
LEXICON D2_M_yo
  aroomaatig	NOUN2_M_yo ;
  bakeeri	NOUN2_M_yo ;
  beel	WARAYSI ;
  beled	AFAREYSI ;
  burciid	NOUN2_M_yo ;
  cadd	WARAYSI ;
  cag	AFAREYSI ;
  coll	AFAREYSI ;
  cul	WARAYSI ;
  dabaggelis	NOUN2_M_yo ;
  daw	AFAREYSI ;
  dhaq	WARAYSI ;
  dhow	AFAREYSI ;
  dibusocod	NOUN2_M_yo ;
  dull	AFAREYSI ;
  eed	WARAYSI ;
  farajann	WARAYSI ;
  fuley	NOUN2_M_yo ;
  gallad	WARAYSI ;
  goggob	AFAREYSI ;
  guf	WARAYSI ;
  gum	AFAREYSI ;
  haadraac	NOUN2_M_yo ;
  haljalafl	WARAYSI ;
  hiir	AFAREYSI ;
  hummaag	NOUN2_M_yo ;
  il	AFAREYSI ;
  jaab	AFAREYSI ;
  jah	WARAYSI ;
  jiml	AFAREYSI ;
  k	AFAREYSI ;
  kaballeef	NOUN2_M_yo ;
  kabbaqubl	WARAYSI ;
  kir	AFAREYSI ;
  labeen	WARAYSI ;
  ladaab	NOUN2_M_yo ;
  maddooy	AFAREYSI ;
  meert	WARAYSI ;
  milay	NOUN2_M_yo ;
  qaniim	AFAREYSI ;
  qardaas	NOUN2_M_yo ;
  qarjaam	WARAYSI ;
  saliim-bishiish	NOUN2_M_yo ;
  saqaf	WARAYSI ;
  sek	AFAREYSI ;
  sigaaryacab	NOUN2_M_yo ;
  uguf	NOUN2_M_yo ;
  w	WARAYSI ;
  yeeg-bibiish	NOUN2_M_yo ;
LEXICON D2_M
  arjantam	NOUN2_M ;
  barbar	NOUN2_M ;
  bohon	NOUN2_M ;
  cajil	NOUN2_M ;
  dabakafur	NOUN2_M ;
  daqar	NOUN2_M ;
  dhartol	NOUN2_M ;
  dubeer	NOUN2_M ;
  gamuun	NOUN2_M ;
  hoteel	NOUN2_M ;
  jusuur	NOUN2_M ;
  maadhiin	NOUN2_M ;
  mimbar	NOUN2_M ;
  qowsaar	NOUN2_M ;
  seesar	NOUN2_M ;
  tinnaar	NOUN2_M ;
  xoryeel	NOUN2_M ;
